Alaska, session 34, HB248.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF ALASKA: 04 * Section 1. AS 14.03 is amended by adding a new section to article 3 to read: 05 Sec. 14.03.320. Correspondence study program student assessment 06 participation. (a) A district correspondence program must maintain a correspondence 07 program student assessment participation rate that meets or exceeds the district student 08 assessment participation rate. 09 (b) The commissioner shall withhold payments of state aid from a district 10 correspondence program that fails to meet the requirements under (a) of this section 11 until the district correspondence program complies with (a) of this section. 12 (c) In this section, 13 (1) "correspondence program student assessment participation rate" 14 means a quotient, expressed as a percentage, obtained by dividing the number of 01 students enrolled in a correspondence program who took a statewide student 02 assessment required by the department under AS 14.03.123(f) administered by the 03 correspondence program by the number of students enrolled in a grade in which the 04 correspondence program administers the assessment on the first day that the 05 correspondence program begins administering the assessment; 06 (2) "district correspondence program" includes a district that offers a 07 statewide correspondence study program; 08 (3) "district student assessment participation rate" means a quotient, 09 expressed as a percentage, obtained by dividing the number of students enrolled in a 10 district who took a statewide student assessment required by the department under 11 AS 14.03.123(f) administered by the district by the number of students enrolled in a 12 grade in which the district administers the assessment on the first day that the district 13 begins administering the assessment. 14 * Sec. 2. This Act takes effect January 1, 2027. Welcome toThe Alaska State Legislature This web site is the place to track bills, locate and contact your legislators, and access committee information. Questions? Try our help wizard or call 907-465-4648. SMS Bill Tracking Text a bill number (ex: HB1) to 559-245-2529 to enroll in text alerts. You will receive an enrollment confirmation and instructions on how to stop receiving the alerts.